Washington statutes.
RCW 13.38.020

Application.

This chapter shall apply in all child custody proceedings as that term is defined in this chapter. Whenever there is a conflict between chapter 13.32A, 13.34, 13.36, *26.10, or 26.33 RCW, the provisions of this chapter shall apply.

[ 2011 c 309 s 2.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: Chapter 26.10 RCW, with the exception of RCW 26.10.115, was repealed by 2020 c 312 s 905. RCW 26.10.115 was repealed by 2021 c 215 s 170, effective July 1, 2022.